Washington statutes.
RCW 43.09.180

Seal—Copies of documents as evidence.

The state auditor shall keep a seal of office for the identification of all papers, writings, and documents required by law to be certified by him or her, and copies authenticated and certified of all papers and documents lawfully deposited in his or her office shall be received in evidence with the same effect as the originals.

[ 1995 c 301 s 7; 1965 c 8 s 43.09.180. Prior: 1890 p 641 s 24; RRS s 11018; prior: Code 1881 s 2587.]